Utah statutes.
61-2f-406.   Grounds for revocation of principal broker's license --
Automatic inactivation of affiliated associate brokers and sales agents
licenses.
(1) (a)  An unlawful act or violation of this chapter committed by a person
listed in Subsection (1)(b) is cause for:
(i)  the revocation, suspension, or probation of a principal broker's license;
or
(ii)  the imposition of a fine against the principal broker in an amount not
to exceed $5,000 per violation.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) applies to an act or violation by any of the following:
(i)  a sales agent or associate broker employed by a principal broker;
(ii)  a sales agent or associate broker engaged as an independent contractor
by or on behalf of a principal broker; or
(iii)  an employee, officer, or member of a principal broker.
(2) (a)  The revocation or suspension of a principal broker license
automatically inactivates an associate broker or sales agent license granted
to an individual by reason of that individual's affiliation with the principal
broker whose license is revoked or suspended, pending a change of principal
broker affiliation.
(b)  A principal broker shall, before the effective date of a suspension or
revocation of the principal broker's license, notify in writing every licensee
affiliated with the principal broker of the revocation or suspension of the
principal broker license.
